Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-605
University of Nebraska or community college; interference with operation; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 85-601 to 85-605, (1) dismissal does not include the failure to renew a probationary appointment of any faculty member or administrative staff member and (2) governing body means the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska or the Community College Board of Governors, as applicable.

Laws 1971, LB 445, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 116.
September 2, 2023